Utah statutes.
32B-4-707.   Consignment sale.

(1)  This section adopts and makes applicable to an industry member, including a beer industry member, doing business in this state, 27 U.S.C. Sec. 205(d) and 27 C.F.R. Sec. 11.1 through 11.46, which make it unlawful for an industry member, directly or indirectly, or through an affiliate to sell, offer for sale, or contract to sell to any wholesaler or retailer engaged in the sale of an alcoholic product, or for any wholesaler or retailer to purchase, offer to purchase, or contract to purchase any of those products on consignment or under conditional sale or with the privilege of return or on any basis otherwise than a bona fide sale, or where any part of the transaction involves, directly or indirectly, the acquisition by that person from the wholesaler or retailer or that person's agreement to acquire from the wholesaler or retailer other alcoholic beverages, if the sale, purchase, offer, or contract is made in the course of interstate or foreign commerce, or if the person or wholesaler or retailer engages in such practice to an extent so as substantially to restrain or prevent transactions in interstate or foreign commerce in any of those products or if the direct effect of the sale, purchase, offer, or contract is to prevent, deter, hinder, or restrict other persons from selling or offering for sale any of those products to the wholesaler or retailer in interstate or foreign commerce.

(2)  This section does not apply to a transaction involving solely the bona fide return of merchandise for ordinary and usual commercial reasons arising after the merchandise has been sold.



Enacted by Chapter 276, 2010 General Session

